Hawaii statutes.
§664-2 Commissioners to keep record. Each
commissioner of boundaries shall keep a record of the commissioner's
proceedings in books, to be furnished the commissioner by the department of
land and natural resources, which books, when filled, shall be returned to the
department. [L 1894-5, c 14, §8; RL 1925, §553; RL 1935, §3661; RL 1945,
§10202; RL 1955, §234-2; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §21; am L 1961, c 132, §1; HRS
§664-2; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next